Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.035

Board to certify successful examinees.

The board shall certify to the secretary the names of all applicants who have successfully passed an examination and are entitled to a license to practice veterinary medicine, surgery and dentistry. The secretary shall thereupon issue a license to practice veterinary medicine, surgery and dentistry to such applicant.

[ 1991 c 3 s 239; 1941 c 71 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-9. Formerly RCW 18.92.030, part.]